Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2930
Program standards, defined.

Program standards means the supplemental guidelines and uniform methods and rules adopted and approved by USDA/APHIS/VS for further clarification of established procedures for the regulation, control, eradication, and enforcement of livestock program diseases.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 30.